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DIDYN-01

CIRCUIT INSPECTION

DTC P 1222/15Throttle Motor Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The throttle control motor is operated by the engine ECU and it opens and closes the throttle valve.

The fully open condition of the throttle valve is detected by the diesel throttle position switch, which is
mounted on the throttle body.

If this DTC is stored, the engine ECU shuts down the power for the throttle control motor.

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

* Open orshortinthrottle control motor circuit

* Open orshortin diesel throttle position switch circuit
Open or shortin throttle control motor circuit « Throttle control motor

* Throttle valve

 Thiottle drive: geal

¢ Dieselthrottle body

Open or short in diesel throttle position switch circuit * Diesel throttle position switch

* Engine ECU

P1222/15
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WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:

Read freeze frame data using the intelligent tester Il. Freeze frame data records the engine conditions when
a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the vehicle was
running or stopped, if the engine was warmed up or not, and other data from the time the malfunction oc-

curred.

1 Check throttle control motor circuit.

Signal Waveform
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PREPARATION:
(@ Connect the oscilloscope between terminals LU+A,
LU+B, LU-A, LU-B and EO1 of the engine ECU.
(b) Start the engine.
CHECK:
Check the waveform between terminals LU+A, LU+B, LU-A,
LU-B and EO1 of the engine ECU when the engine is racing.
OK:
The correct waveforms are as shown.

OK> Go to step 5.

2 [ Check voltage of throttle control motor circuit.

+B1

+B2

A23893
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PREPARATION:
(@) Disconnect the throttle control motor.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage between terminals 2 and 5 of the throttle
control motor connector and body ground.
OK:
Voltage:9to 14V

tween EFI OR ECD relay and throttle control mo-
tor (See page IN-19).

NG> Check for open in harness and connector be-




DI-94
DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE

3 Check throttle control motor.

PREPARATION:
Disconnectthethrottle control motor connector.
CHECK:
. Measuretheresistance betweenterminals 1,3 and?2 of
the throttle control motor.
. Measuretheresistance betweenterminals 4,6 and 5 of
the throttle control motor.
| OK:
p Al6846 Resistance: 18t 022 Q at20 °C (68 °F)

@

4 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between throttle control mo-
tor and engine ECU (See page IN-19).

Ohmmeter

NG Replace diesel throttle body assembly (See Pub
No.RM896E,pageED -1).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

@

Check and replace engine ECU (See page
IN-19).
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5 [ Check diesel throttle position switch.

PREPARATION:

CHECK:

position switch.
OK:

Disconnector the diesel throttle position switch.

Measure the resistance between terminal of the diesel throttle

Throttle Valve Position

Diesel throttle position switch signal

Fully closed

10 k< or higher

Fully open

Below 1 Q

NG Replace diesel throttle body assembly (See Pub
No. RM896E, page ED-1).

3

tion switch and engine ECU (See page IN-19).

6 [ Check for open and short in harness and connector between diesel throttle posi-

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

@

tion switch and body ground (See page IN-19).

7 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between diesel throttle posi-

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

3

Check and replace engine ECU (See page
IN-19).
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